csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoowaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoowangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: maajiibatoowiingibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoosiiwambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: maajiibatoosiiwangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: maajiibatoosiiwiingibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: madaabiiyaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: madaabiiyeg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: madaabiiyan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaad
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabiid
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: madaabiiyaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: madaabiiyang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: madaabiing
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiwaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiweg
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisigwaa
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisinig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisig
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: madaabiisiwaang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: madaabiisiwang
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: madaabiising
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: madaabiiyaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: madaabiiyegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: madaabiiyamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaapan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiipan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: madaabiiyaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: madaabiiyangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: madaabiingiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiwaambaan
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiwegiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiwamban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: madaabiisiwaangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: madaabiisiwangiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: madaabiisingiban
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: madaabiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: madaabiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: madaabiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: madaabiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: madaabiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: madaabiiwiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiiwegwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwaagwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigwen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: madaabiisiiwaangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: madaabiisiiwangen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: madaabiisiiwiingen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: madaabiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: madaabiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: madaabiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: madaabiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: madaabiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: madaabiiwiingibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwaambaanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: madaabiisiiwegibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: madaabiisiiwambanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwaagobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigobanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: madaabiisiiwaangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: madaabiisiiwangibanen
     madaabii+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: madaabiisiiwiingibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nibaayaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: nibaayeg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: nibaayan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nibaayaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: nibaayang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nibaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: nibaasiwaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: nibaasiweg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: nibaasiwan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaasigwaa
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaasig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nibaasiwaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: nibaasiwang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nibaasing
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nibaayaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: nibaayegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: nibaayamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nibaayaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: nibaayangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nibaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nibaasiwaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: nibaasiwegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: nibaasiwamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nibaasiwaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: nibaasiwangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nibaasingiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nibaawaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: nibaawegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: nibaawanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nibaawaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: nibaawangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nibaawiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nibaasiiwaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: nibaasiiwegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: nibaasiiwanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nibaasiiwaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: nibaasiiwangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nibaasiiwiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nibaawaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nibaawegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nibaawambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaawaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nibaawaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nibaawangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: nibaawiingibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nibaasiiwaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: nibaasiiwegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: nibaasiiwambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: nibaasiiwaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: nibaasiiwangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: nibaasiiwiingibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: webinigeyaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: webinigeyeg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: webinigeyan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaad
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webiniged
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: webinigeyaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: webinigeyang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: webinigeng
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: webinigesiwaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: webinigesiweg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: webinigesiwan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigesigwaa
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webinigesig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: webinigesiwaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: webinigesiwang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: webinigesing
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: webinigeyaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: webinigeyegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: webinigeyamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigewaapan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigepan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: webinigeyaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: webinigeyangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: webinigengiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: webinigesiwaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: webinigesiwegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: webinigesiwamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: webinigesiwaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: webinigesiwangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: webinigesingiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: webinigewaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: webinigewegwen
